Utah statutes.
17-25a-3.   County and city constables -- Terms -- Authority -- Deputies.

(1)  Constables appointed by a county or city are appointed for terms of six years and may serve more than one term if reappointed by the appointing body.

(2)  Constables serving process outside the county in which they are appointed shall contact the sheriff's office or police department of the jurisdiction prior to serving executions or bench warrants or seizing any property.

(3)  The appointed constable may, upon approval of the appointing county or city, employ and deputize persons who are certified as special function peace officers to function as deputy constables.

(4)  If the county or city appointing body withdraws the authority of a constable, the authority of all deputy constables is also withdrawn.

(5)  If the authority of a constable or deputy constable is withdrawn, notification of the Peace Officer Standards and Training Division of the Department of Public Safety shall be made pursuant to Section 53-6-209.

